Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Chapter 06. Alaska Corporations Code.

Cross references. —

For action by attorney general against a person who usurps a corporate office and against persons acting as a corporation without being incorporated, see AS

09.50.310

.

For temporary provisions relating to shareholder meetings, proxies, and electronic communications during the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared on March 11, 2020, see § 12, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

For a saving clause providing that the 2021 amendments to AS

10.06.223

,

10.06.230

,

10.06.405

,

10.06.410

,

10.06.413

,

10.06.415

,

10.06.418

,

10.06.420

,

10.06.470

,

10.06.960

, and

10.06.990

, do not affect a court action or court proceeding begun on a right accrued before Apri1 1, 2021, see sec. 29, ch. 1, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 7, ch. 166, SLA 1988, provides:

“(a) Except as otherwise expressly provided, the provisions of this Act apply on and after July 1, 1989 to:

“(1) a domestic corporation organized under the former Alaska Business Corporations Act (AS 10.05) existing on July 1, 1989;

“(2) a foreign corporation that is authorized to do or does business in the state on or after July 1, 1989;

“(3) actions by a director, officer, or shareholder of a corporation described in (1) and (2) of this subsection on and after July 1, 1989.

“(b) Except as otherwise expressly provided, a section of this Act governing acts, contracts, or other transactions by a corporation or its directors, officers, or shareholders applies only to acts, contracts, or transactions occurring on or after July 1, 1989 and the provisions of former AS 10.05 govern acts, contracts, or transactions occurring before July 1, 1989.

“(c) Except as otherwise expressly provided, a vote or consent by the directors or shareholders of a corporation before July 1, 1989 in accordance with the provisions of former AS 10.05 is effective, and if a certificate or document is required to be filed in a public office of the state relating to the action, it may be filed after July 1, 1989 in accordance with the provisions of former AS 10.05.”

Section 13, ch. 166, SLA 1988, provides: “If a person holds an office under a law repealed by this Act, that person shall continue to hold the office according to its former tenure if the office is continued by this Act.”

Section 14, ch. 166, SLA 1988, provides: “This Act does not affect a cause of action, liability, penalty or special proceeding existing, incurred or accrued on July 1, 1989.”

Legislative history reports. —

For a transmittal letter, sectional analysis, and commentary on HB 322, from which ch. 166, SLA 1988, which enacted this chapter, derives, see House & Senate Joint Journal Supplement No. 9, May 15, 1987; for a transmittal letter and sectional analysis of SB 204, from which ch. 82, SLA 1989, which amended this chapter, derives, see Senate & House Joint Journal Supplement No. 8, March 6, 1989.

Collateral references. —

Gladys Glickman, Franchising (Matthew Bender).

Fox and Fox, Corporate Acquisitions and Mergers (Matthew Bender).

Joseph D. Zamore, Business Torts (Matthew Bender).

Chester Rohrlich, Organizing Corporate and Other Business Enterprises (Matthew Bender).

Jeffrey A. Jannuzzo, Preparing for a Deposition in a Business Case (Matthew Bender).

Berrien C. Eaton, Professional Corporations and Associations (Matthew Bender).

Business Law Monographs (Matthew Bender).

Rosden and Rosden, The Law of Advertising (Matthew Bender).

Robinson and Weiss, Tax Planning for S Corporations (Matthew Bender).

Cavitch and Cavitch, Tax Planning for Corporations and Shareholders (Matthew Bender).

Cavitch and Cavitch, Tax Planning for Corporations and Shareholders: Forms (Matthew Bender).

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations, §§ 150 —
221.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations, § 157 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations, § 1 et seq.

Workers’ compensation immunity as extending to one owning controlling interest in employer corporation. 30 ALR4th 948.